South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B)(37) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (37) one personal motor vehicle owned or leased by a legal guardian of a minor or dependent child who is blind or required to use a wheelchair when the vehicle is used to transport the minor or dependent child. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----